Missouri, session 2026, SB1086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 195, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 195.1000, to read as
follows:
195.1000. Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, ivermectin and hydroxychloroquine tablets
suitable for human use may be sold or purchased as over-the-
counter medications in this state without a prescription or
consultation with a pharmacist or other health care
professional.
✓